fi/fi_FI.aff
FLAG num
SFX 28421 N 1
SFX 28421 ota toaisin .
SFX 28422 N 1
SFX 28422 ota toamaan .
SFX 28423 N 1
SFX 28423 ota toamalla .
SFX 28424 N 1
SFX 28424 ota toamassa .
SFX 28425 N 1
SFX 28425 ota toamatta .
SFX 28426 N 1
SFX 28426 ota toan .
SFX 28427 N 1
SFX 28427 ota toat .
SFX 28428 N 1
SFX 28428 ota toavat .
SFX 28429 N 1
SFX 28429 ota tosi .
SFX 28430 N 1
SFX 28430 ota tosin .
SFX 28431 N 1
SFX 28431 ota tosivat .
SFX 28432 N 1
SFX 28432 aa oatko .
SFX 28433 N 1
SFX 28433 kirja -kirjoista .
SFX 28434 N 1
SFX 28434 toa otaan .
SFX 28435 N 1
SFX 28435 toa ottiin .
SFX 28436 N 1
SFX 28436 toa ottu .
SFX 28437 N 1
SFX 28437 toa ottua .
SFX 28438 N 1
SFX 28438 n moissa .
SFX 28439 N 1
SFX 28439 n mon .
SFX 28440 N 1
SFX 28440 n mosta .
SFX 28441 N 1
SFX 28441 n mot .
SFX 28442 N 1
SFX 28442 0 nassa .
SFX 28443 N 1
SFX 28443 0 taa .
SFX 28444 N 1
SFX 28444 en nalla .
SFX 28445 N 1
SFX 28445 en nasta .
SFX 28446 N 1
SFX 28446 ata kaavamme .
SFX 28447 N 1
SFX 28447 ata kaavasi .
SFX 28448 N 1
SFX 28448 ata kaaviksi .
SFX 28449 N 1
SFX 28449 ata kaavin .
SFX 28450 N 1
SFX 28450 ata kaavina .
SFX 28451 N 1
SFX 28451 n vaa .
SFX 28452 N 1
SFX 28452 tua nuinkin .
SFX 28453 N 1
SFX 28453 tua nuitko .
SFX 28454 N 1
SFX 28454 tua nuitte .
SFX 28455 N 1
SFX 28455 tua nunko .
SFX 28456 N 1
SFX 28456 tua nutko .
SFX 28457 N 1
SFX 28457 et iensa .
SFX 28458 N 1
SFX 28458 suomi -suomesta .
SFX 28459 N 1
SFX 28459 s akseen .
SFX 28460 N 1
SFX 28460 s aksikin .
SFX 28461 N 1
SFX 28461 s allaan .
SFX 28462 N 1
SFX 28462 s allakaan .
SFX 28463 N 1
SFX 28463 s allakin .
SFX 28464 N 1
SFX 28464 s allamme .
SFX 28465 N 1
SFX 28465 s aseeni .
SFX 28466 N 1
SFX 28466 s astani .
SFX 28467 N 1
SFX 28467 buffet -buffet .
SFX 28468 N 1
SFX 28468 to noilleni .
SFX 28469 N 1
SFX 28469 eta keneetkin .
SFX 28470 N 1
SFX 28470 ella telemiesi .
SFX 28471 N 1
SFX 28471 ella telemiini .
SFX 28472 N 1
SFX 28472 ella telemiisi .
SFX 28473 N 1
SFX 28473 ella telemillasi .
SFX 28474 N 1
SFX 28474 ella telemissani .
SFX 28475 N 1
SFX 28475 ella telemissasi .
SFX 28476 N 1
SFX 28476 ella telemistasi .
SFX 28477 N 1
SFX 28477 ella telo .
SFX 28478 N 1
SFX 28478 ella teloi .
SFX 28479 N 1
SFX 28479 ella teloivat .
SFX 28480 N 1
SFX 28480 ella telon .
SFX 28481 N 1
SFX 28481 ella teluna .
SFX 28482 N 1
SFX 28482 eteta kea .
SFX 28483 N 1
SFX 28483 a vaksesi .
SFX 28484 N 1
SFX 28484 aa uani .
SFX 28485 N 1
SFX 28485 agentti -agentti .
SFX 28486 N 1
SFX 28486 aa isivat .
SFX 28487 N 1
SFX 28487 a imiin .
SFX 28488 N 1
SFX 28488 n millakin .
SFX 28489 N 1
SFX 28489 ta ehan .
SFX 28490 N 1
SFX 28490 ukea eikaten .
SFX 28491 N 1
SFX 28491 ukea eikkaa .
SFX 28492 N 1
SFX 28492 ukea eikkaako .
SFX 28493 N 1
SFX 28493 ukea eipoen .
SFX 28494 N 1
SFX 28494 kea ehan .
SFX 28495 N 1
SFX 28495 kea enhan .
SFX 28496 N 1
SFX 28496 kea enpa .
SFX 28497 N 1
SFX 28497 kea epas .
SFX 28498 N 1
SFX 28498 kea etaanhan .
SFX 28499 N 1
SFX 28499 kea etaanpas .
SFX 28500 N 1
SFX 28500 kea eteltu .
SFX 28501 N 1
SFX 28501 kea ettakoon .
SFX 28502 N 1
SFX 28502 kea ettavaahan .
SFX 28503 N 1
SFX 28503 kea ettavaakin .
SFX 28504 N 1
SFX 28504 kea ettavakseen .
SFX 28505 N 1
SFX 28505 kea ettavaksemme .
SFX 28506 N 1
SFX 28506 kea ettavakseni .
SFX 28507 N 1
SFX 28507 kea ettavaksenne .
SFX 28508 N 1
SFX 28508 kea ettavaksesi .
SFX 28509 N 1
SFX 28509 kea ettavaksikin .
SFX 28510 N 1
SFX 28510 kea ettavalla .
SFX 28511 N 1
SFX 28511 kea ettavalle .
SFX 28512 N 1
SFX 28512 kea ettavalta .
SFX 28513 N 1
SFX 28513 kea ettavammaksi .
SFX 28514 N 1
SFX 28514 kea ettavanaan .
SFX 28515 N 1
SFX 28515 kea ettavanani .
SFX 28516 N 1
SFX 28516 kea ettavanasi .
SFX 28517 N 1
SFX 28517 kea ettavani .
SFX 28518 N 1
SFX 28518 kea ettavansa .
SFX 28519 N 1
SFX 28519 kea ettavikseen .
SFX 28520 N 1
SFX 28520 kea ettavilta .
SFX 28521 N 1
SFX 28521 kea ettehan .
SFX 28522 N 1
SFX 28522 kea ettuanikaan .
SFX 28523 N 1
SFX 28523 kea ettuanikin .
SFX 28524 N 1
SFX 28524 kea ettuanne .
SFX 28525 N 1
SFX 28525 kea ettujakin .
SFX 28526 N 1
SFX 28526 kea ettunakin .
SFX 28527 N 1
SFX 28527 kea etuimmat .
SFX 28528 N 1
SFX 28528 kea etuksikin .
SFX 28529 N 1
SFX 28529 kea ikin .
SFX 28530 N 1
SFX 28530 kea inhan .
SFX 28531 N 1
SFX 28531 kea inpa .
SFX 28532 N 1
SFX 28532 kea inpas .
SFX 28533 N 1
SFX 28533 kea ithan .
SFX 28534 N 1
SFX 28534 kea itkos .
SFX 28535 N 1
SFX 28535 kea itte .
SFX 28536 N 1
SFX 28536 a ekos .
SFX 28537 N 1
SFX 28537 a miltani .
SFX 28538 N 1
SFX 28538 ea iessahan .
SFX 28539 N 1
SFX 28539 ea iessakaan .
SFX 28540 N 1
SFX 28540 ea ijalle .
SFX 28541 N 1
SFX 28541 ea isitteko .
SFX 28542 N 1
SFX 28542 ea ita .
SFX 28543 N 1
SFX 28543 ea ittu .
SFX 28544 N 1
SFX 28544 ea itu .
SFX 28545 N 1
SFX 28545 ea uisia .
SFX 28546 N 1
SFX 28546 ea uun .
SFX 28547 N 1
SFX 28547 kea si .
SFX 28548 N 1
SFX 28548 kea sin .
SFX 28549 N 1
SFX 28549 kea sit .
SFX 28550 N 1
SFX 28550 kea ulemma .
SFX 28551 N 1
SFX 28551 kea ulenpa .
SFX 28552 N 1
SFX 28552 kea ulko .
SFX 28553 N 1
SFX 28553 kea ulleen .
SFX 28554 N 1
SFX 28554 kea ullen .
SFX 28555 N 1
SFX 28555 kea ultava .
SFX 28556 N 1
SFX 28556 kea vassa .
SFX 28557 N 1
SFX 28557 kea vin .
SFX 28558 N 1
SFX 28558 a isteni .
SFX 28559 N 1
SFX 28559 et ieni .
SFX 28560 N 1
SFX 28560 ta eenkaan .
SFX 28561 N 1
SFX 28561 ki teet .
SFX 28562 N 1
SFX 28562 a oiksemme .
SFX 28563 N 1
SFX 28563 a oiltakin .
SFX 28564 N 1
SFX 28564 palsta npalstalla .
SFX 28565 N 1
SFX 28565 koulu nkoulu .
SFX 28566 N 1
SFX 28566 koulu nkoulussa .
SFX 28567 N 1
SFX 28567 kia itkaa .
SFX 28568 N 1
SFX 28568 kia ittavalla .
SFX 28569 N 1
SFX 28569 kia ittunakin .
SFX 28570 N 1
SFX 28570 kia ittuneen .
SFX 28571 N 1
SFX 28571 kia ittuneena .
SFX 28572 N 1
SFX 28572 kia ittuva .
SFX 28573 N 1
SFX 28573 kia ittuvat .
SFX 28574 N 1
SFX 28574 kia ittuvia .
SFX 28575 N 1
SFX 28575 kia itu .
SFX 28576 N 1
SFX 28576 jin kimista .
SFX 28577 N 1
SFX 28577 0 isien .
SFX 28578 N 1
SFX 28578 ku vuikseen .
SFX 28579 N 1
SFX 28579 ku vuillakin .
SFX 28580 N 1
SFX 28580 ku vuilleen .
SFX 28581 N 1
SFX 28581 ku vuilta .
SFX 28582 N 1
SFX 28582 ku vuissani .
SFX 28583 N 1
SFX 28583 ku vuistasi .
SFX 28584 N 1
SFX 28584 ku vukseen .
SFX 28585 N 1
SFX 28585 ku vullahan .
SFX 28586 N 1
SFX 28586 ku vullakaan .
SFX 28587 N 1
SFX 28587 ku vullakin .
SFX 28588 N 1
SFX 28588 ku vunkin .
SFX 28589 N 1
SFX 28589 ku vussakin .
SFX 28590 N 1
SFX 28590 ku vuthan .
SFX 28591 N 1
SFX 28591 a isan .
SFX 28592 N 1
SFX 28592 kua vut .
SFX 28593 N 1
SFX 28593 it ejaan .
SFX 28594 N 1
SFX 28594 ti dillani .
SFX 28595 N 1
SFX 28595 ume ed .
SFX 28596 N 1
SFX 28596 mi nta .
SFX 28597 N 1
SFX 28597 mi ntakin .
SFX 28598 N 1
SFX 28598 nen lua .
SFX 28599 N 1
SFX 28599 ky yssä .
SFX 28600 N 1
SFX 28600 me peeseen .
SFX 28601 N 1
SFX 28601 me peesta .
SFX 28602 N 1
SFX 28602 me peet .
SFX 28603 N 1
SFX 28603 me peiden .
SFX 28604 N 1
SFX 28604 me peineen .
SFX 28605 N 1
SFX 28605 me peista .
SFX 28606 N 1
SFX 28606 me peita .
SFX 28607 N 1
SFX 28607 me peitten .
SFX 28608 N 1
SFX 28608 0 ava .
SFX 28609 N 1
SFX 28609 uo oilla .
SFX 28610 N 1
SFX 28610 uo oista .
SFX 28611 N 1
SFX 28611 uo oistava .
SFX 28612 N 1
SFX 28612 uo oma .
SFX 28613 N 1
SFX 28613 uo omat .
SFX 28614 N 1
SFX 28614 o e .
SFX 28615 N 1
SFX 28615 0 kan .
SFX 28616 N 1
SFX 28616 0 kat .
SFX 28617 N 1
SFX 28617 0 mu .
SFX 28618 N 1
SFX 28618 uoda oisii .
SFX 28619 N 1
SFX 28619 uoda oistakoot .
SFX 28620 N 1
SFX 28620 uoda oma .
SFX 28621 N 1
SFX 28621 oda e .
SFX 28622 N 1
SFX 28622 oda et .
SFX 28623 N 1
SFX 28623 oda etaan .
SFX 28624 N 1
SFX 28624 oda ettavaa .
SFX 28625 N 1
SFX 28625 oda ettavissa .
SFX 28626 N 1
SFX 28626 oda ettu .
SFX 28627 N 1
SFX 28627 oda etun .
SFX 28628 N 1
SFX 28628 oda etut .
SFX 28629 N 1
SFX 28629 oda in .
SFX 28630 N 1
SFX 28630 oda inko .
SFX 28631 N 1
SFX 28631 oda isu .
SFX 28632 N 1
SFX 28632 oda itko .
SFX 28633 N 1
SFX 28633 oda itteko .
SFX 28634 N 1
SFX 28634 da kseen .
SFX 28635 N 1
SFX 28635 da ksesi .
SFX 28636 N 1
SFX 28636 da maamme .
SFX 28637 N 1
SFX 28637 da mallani .
SFX 28638 N 1
SFX 28638 da malleni .
SFX 28639 N 1
SFX 28639 da maltaan .
SFX 28640 N 1
SFX 28640 da manne .
SFX 28641 N 1
SFX 28641 da miamme .
SFX 28642 N 1
SFX 28642 da miani .
SFX 28643 N 1
SFX 28643 da miasi .
SFX 28644 N 1
SFX 28644 da miisi .
SFX 28645 N 1
SFX 28645 da miksi .
SFX 28646 N 1
SFX 28646 da millaan .
SFX 28647 N 1
SFX 28647 da millani .
SFX 28648 N 1
SFX 28648 da millasi .
SFX 28649 N 1
SFX 28649 da milleen .
SFX 28650 N 1
SFX 28650 da min .
SFX 28651 N 1
SFX 28651 da minen .
SFX 28652 N 1
SFX 28652 da mistamme .
SFX 28653 N 1
SFX 28653 da mistasi .
SFX 28654 N 1
SFX 28654 da mmeko .
SFX 28655 N 1
SFX 28655 da muja .
SFX 28656 N 1
SFX 28656 da muna .
SFX 28657 N 1
SFX 28657 da neelta .
SFX 28658 N 1
SFX 28658 da neeseen .
SFX 28659 N 1
SFX 28659 da neisiin .
SFX 28660 N 1
SFX 28660 da nnos .
SFX 28661 N 1
SFX 28661 da taava .
SFX 28662 N 1
SFX 28662 da taisiinkin .
SFX 28663 N 1
SFX 28663 da tanko .
SFX 28664 N 1
SFX 28664 da toa .
SFX 28665 N 1
SFX 28665 da ttaen .
SFX 28666 N 1
SFX 28666 da ttavalla .
SFX 28667 N 1
SFX 28667 da ttavissa .
SFX 28668 N 1
SFX 28668 da tto .
SFX 28669 N 1
SFX 28669 da vanne .
SFX 28670 N 1
SFX 28670 da vi .
SFX 28671 N 1
SFX 28671 da visi .
SFX 28672 N 1
SFX 28672 da vivat .
SFX 28673 N 1
SFX 28673 da vu .
SFX 28674 N 1
SFX 28674 da vunko .
SFX 28675 N 1
SFX 28675 oda ulet .
SFX 28676 N 1
SFX 28676 oda ulette .
SFX 28677 N 1
SFX 28677 data kaamme .
SFX 28678 N 1
SFX 28678 data massamme .
SFX 28679 N 1
SFX 28679 ka allensa .
SFX 28680 N 1
SFX 28680 ka altamme .
SFX 28681 N 1
SFX 28681 ka altasi .
SFX 28682 N 1
SFX 28682 se ka .
SFX 28683 N 1
SFX 28683 a sessa .
SFX 28684 N 1
SFX 28684 a sessaan .
PFX 28685 N 1
PFX 28685 luomiväri luomivärin .
SFX 28686 Y 1
SFX 28686 0 a .
PFX 28686 Y 1
PFX 28686 luomiväri luomivärin .
SFX 28687 Y 1
SFX 28687 0 n .
PFX 28687 Y 1
PFX 28687 luomiväri luomivärin .
SFX 28688 N 1
SFX 28688 0 teensa .
SFX 28689 N 1
SFX 28689 ne teellensa .
SFX 28690 N 1
SFX 28690 ne teeltamme .
SFX 28691 N 1
SFX 28691 ne teeltanne .
SFX 28692 N 1
SFX 28692 ne teeltansa .
SFX 28693 N 1
SFX 28693 ne teensakin .
SFX 28694 N 1
SFX 28694 ne teiltamme .
SFX 28695 Y 1
SFX 28695 0 ta .
PFX 28695 Y 1
PFX 28695 luonne luonteen .
SFX 28696 N 1
SFX 28696 nelaatu teenlaaduista .
SFX 28697 N 1
SFX 28697 nelaatu teenlaadulleni .
SFX 28698 N 1
SFX 28698 nelaatu teenlaadultaan .
SFX 28699 N 1
SFX 28699 nelaatu teenlaadusta .
SFX 28700 N 1
SFX 28700 nelaatu teenlaadustaan .
SFX 28701 N 1
SFX 28701 nelaatu teenlaadustani .
SFX 28702 Y 1
SFX 28702 0 ni .
PFX 28702 Y 1
PFX 28702 luonne luonteen .
SFX 28703 Y 1
SFX 28703 0 un .
PFX 28703 Y 1
PFX 28703 luonne luonteen .
SFX 28704 Y 1
SFX 28704 s den .
PFX 28704 Y 1
PFX 28704 luonne luonteen .
PFX 28705 N 1
PFX 28705 luonne luonteen .
SFX 28706 Y 1
SFX 28706 s tta .
PFX 28706 Y 1
PFX 28706 luonne luonteen .
SFX 28707 Y 1
SFX 28707 s ksen .
PFX 28707 Y 1
PFX 28707 luonne luonteen .
SFX 28708 Y 1
SFX 28708 s kset .
PFX 28708 Y 1
PFX 28708 luonne luonteen .
SFX 28709 N 1
SFX 28709 neomaa teenomaisin .
SFX 28710 N 1
SFX 28710 neomainen teenomaiseen .
SFX 28711 N 1
SFX 28711 neomainen teenomaiseksi .
SFX 28712 N 1
SFX 28712 neomainen teenomaisella .
SFX 28713 N 1
SFX 28713 neomainen teenomaisempaa .
SFX 28714 N 1
SFX 28714 neomainen teenomaisena .
SFX 28715 N 1
SFX 28715 neomainen teenomaisessa .
SFX 28716 N 1
SFX 28716 neomainen teenomaisesta .
SFX 28717 N 1
SFX 28717 neomainen teenomaiset .
SFX 28718 N 1
SFX 28718 neomainen teenomaisia .
SFX 28719 N 1
SFX 28719 neomainen teenomaisiin .
SFX 28720 N 1
SFX 28720 neomainen teenomaisimmat .
SFX 28721 N 1
SFX 28721 neomainen teenomaisimpia .
SFX 28722 N 1
SFX 28722 neomainen teenomaisin .
SFX 28723 N 1
SFX 28723 neomainen teenomaisina .
SFX 28724 N 1
SFX 28724 neomainen teenomaisinta .
SFX 28725 N 1
SFX 28725 neomainen teenomaisista .
SFX 28726 N 1
SFX 28726 neomainen teenomaisten .
SFX 28727 Y 1
SFX 28727 s det .
PFX 28727 Y 1
PFX 28727 luonne luonteen .
